District of Columbia statutes.
2-1831.18

Study of and report on Bureau of Traffic Adjudication.

The Mayor shall conduct a study to consider methods to improve the quality of adjudications within the Bureau of Traffic Adjudication at the Department of Motor Vehicles. This study shall review best practices in other jurisdictions and examine issues such as staffing levels, timeliness of decisions, caseloads, and qualifications of hearing examiners. The Mayor shall provide a report to the Council, including recommendations for legislative and operational changes, by October 1, 2002.

Mar. 6, 2002, D.C. Law 14-76, § 21, 48 DCR 11442